Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.079

Business day.

"Business day" means Monday through Friday and excludes Saturday, Sunday, and state and federal holidays.

[ 2010 c 161 s 106.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.